test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_valkia_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - valkkee ok: # Noun 'bål' n_23 valkkee, ES ok
     valkia+N+Sg+Nom: valkia
     valkia+N+Sg+Gen: valkian
     valkia+N+Sg+Par: valkiaa
     valkia+N+Sg+Tra: valkiaksi
     valkia+N+Sg+Abe: valkiatta
     valkia+N+Sg+Ine: valkiassa
     valkia+N+Sg+Ela: valkiasta
     valkia+N+Sg+Ill: valkihaan
     valkia+N+Sg+Ade: valkialla
     valkia+N+Sg+Abl: valkialta
     valkia+N+Sg+All: valkialle
     valkia+N+Sg+Ess: valkianna
     valkia+N+Pl+Nom: valkiat
     valkia+N+Pl+Gen: valkeitten
     valkia+N+Pl+Par: valkeita
     valkia+N+Pl+Tra: valkeiksi
     valkia+N+Pl+Abe: valkeitta
     valkia+N+Pl+Ine: valkeissa
     valkia+N+Pl+Ela: valkeista
     valkia+N+Pl+Ill: valkeissiin
     valkia+N+Pl+Ade: valkeila
     valkia+N+Pl+Abl: valkeilta
     valkia+N+Pl+All: valkeile
     valkia+N+Pl+Ess: valkeina
     valkia+N+Pl+Com: valkeine
